Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-260.02
Juvenile pretrial diversion program; authorized.

A county attorney may establish a juvenile pretrial diversion program with the concurrence of the county board. If the county is part of a multicounty juvenile services plan under the Nebraska County Juvenile Services Plan Act, the county attorney may establish a juvenile pretrial diversion program in conjunction with other county attorneys from counties that are a part of such multicounty plan. A city attorney may establish a juvenile pretrial diversion program with the concurrence of the governing body of the city. Such programs shall meet the requirements of sections 43-260.02 to 43-260.07.

Laws 2003, LB 43, § 1.

Nebraska County Juvenile Services Plan Act, see section 43-3501.